Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-507
Violations; penalty.

Any person who shall fail to comply with any of the provisions of sections 57-501 to 57-507 shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Each violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1951, c. 188, § 7, p. 698;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 56.